Utah statutes.
62A-15-617.   Expenses of voluntary patients.

The expense for the care and treatment of voluntary patients shall be assessed to and paid in the same manner and to the same extent as is provided for involuntary patients under the provisions of Section 62A-15-607.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 8, 2002 Special Session 5

